Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3558
Hospital districts; bonds; issuance; limitation.

The aggregate amount of bonds issued for all purposes in hospital districts shall in no event exceed fourteen percent of the last taxable valuation of all taxable property in such hospital district, but such limitation shall not apply to the issuance of refunding or compromise of indebtedness bonds by any such hospital district for the purpose of retiring outstanding bonds, warrants, or other indebtedness.

Laws 1967, c. 109, § 5, p. 353;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 112;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.53;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 118.